Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-1178
Maintenance in sanitary condition; rules and regulations.

Every livestock auction market shall be maintained in a sanitary condition under the rules and regulations as prescribed by the director.

Laws 1963, c. 319, § 22, p. 970.